Maryland, session 2025, HB0451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
17–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Construction license” means a license issued by the clerk to do construction
business.
(c) (1) “Do construction business” means to agree to:
(i) pave or curb a sidewalk, street, or other public or private
property;
(ii) excavate earth, rock, or other material for a foundation or other
purpose; or
(iii) do work on or in a building or other structure that requires the
use of a building material, including:
1. paint;
2. stone;
3. brick;
4. mortar;
5. wood;
6. cement;
7. structural iron;
8. structural steel;

HOUSE BILL 451 3
9. sheet iron;
10. galvanized iron;
11. metallic piping;
12. tin;
13. lead;
14. electric wiring; or
15. any other metal.
(2) “Do construction business” does not include home improvement as
defined in § 8–101 of this article.
(d) “Nonresident construction license” means a construction license issued by the
clerk to a person who is incorporated or has its principal office in another state.
17–604.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT” MEANS A CONTRACT TO DO
CONSTRUCTION BUSINESS.
(3) “CONTRACTOR” MEANS THE HOLDER OF A CONSTRUCTION
LICENSE WHO IS PARTY TO A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT.
(4) “OWNER” MEANS A PERSON OR AN ENTITY OTHER THAN A PUBLIC
BODY RESPONSIBLE FOR CONTRACTING.
(5) “SUBCONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON OTHER THAN A LABORER
OR SUPPLIER OF MATERIALS WHO MAKES AN ORAL OR WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH:
(I) A CONTRACTOR TO PERFORM ALL OR PART OF A
CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT; OR
(II) ANOTHER SUBCONTRACTOR TO PERFORM ALL OR PART OF
A SUBCONTRACT TO A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT.
(B) (1) A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE A PROVISION THAT

HOUSE BILL 451
REQUIRES THE OWNER TO PAY THE CONTRACTOR WITHIN 60 DAYS OF THE RECEIPT
OF AN INVOICE FOLLOWING SATISFACTORY COMPLETION OF THE PORTION OF THE
WORK FOR WHICH THE CONTRACTOR HAS INVOICED.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO REQUIRE AN OWNER TO PAY AMOUNTS INVOICED THAT ARE SUBJECT TO
WITHHOLDING AS A RESULT OF THE CONTRACTOR’S NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE
CONTRACT.
(3) IF AN OWNER WITHHOLDS ALL OR PART OF AN AMOUNT INVOICED
BY A CONTRACTOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OWNER SHALL
NOTIFY THE CONTRACTOR IN WRITING AND WITH REASONABLE SPECIFICITY WITHIN
60 DAYS OF THE RECEIPT OF THE INVOICE OF:
(I) THE OWNER’S INTENTION TO WITHHOLD ALL OR PART OF
THE PAYMENT; AND
(II) THE REASON FOR THE WITHHOLDING.
(4) (I) IF AN OWNER DOES NOT PAY A CONTRACTOR AS REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE AT THE
RATE OF 9% A YEAR ON ANY AMOUNT THAT REMAINS UNPAID.
(II) INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE BEGINNING ON THE 60TH DAY
AFTER THE OWNER RECEIVES THE INVOICE.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY TO
OR PROHIBIT THE INCLUSION OF ANY RETAINAGE PROVISIONS IN A CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACT.
(C) (1) A CONTRACT BETWEEN A CONTRACTOR AND A SUBCONTRACTOR
TO PERFORM A PORTION OF A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE A
PROVISION THAT REQUIRES THE CONTRACTOR TO PAY THE SUBCONTRACTOR
WITHIN:
(I) 60 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF AN INVOICE FOLLOWING
SATISFACTORY COMPLETION OF THE PORTION OF THE WORK FOR WHICH THE
SUBCONTRACTOR HAS INVOICED; OR
(II) 7 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF PAYMENT BY THE OWNER TO THE
CONTRACTOR FOR WORK PERFORMED BY THE SUBCONTRACTOR.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED

HOUSE BILL 451 5
TO REQUIRE A CONTRACTOR TO PAY AMOUNTS INVOICED THAT ARE SUBJECT TO
WITHHOLDING AS A RESULT OF THE SUBCONTRACTOR’S NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE
CONTRACT.
(3) IF A CONTRACTOR WITHHOLDS ALL OR PART OF AN AMOUNT
INVOICED BY A SUBCONTRACTOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
CONTRACTOR SHALL NOTIFY THE SUBCONTRACTOR IN WRITING AND WITH
REASONABLE SPECIFICITY WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE INVOICE
OF:
(I) THE CONTRACTOR’S INTENTION TO WITHHOLD ALL OR PART
OF THE PAYMENT; AND
(II) THE REASON FOR THE WITHHOLDING.
(4) PAYMENT OF A CONTRACTOR BY AN OWNER MAY NOT BE A
REQUIRED CONDITION FOR PAYMENT OF A SUBCONTRACTOR UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE OWNER IS INSOLVENT OR HAS FILED FOR
BANKRUPTCY PROTECTION UNDER TITLE 11 OF THE UNITED STATES CODE.
(5) (I) IF A CONTRACTOR DOES NOT PAY A SUBCONTRACTOR AS
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE
AT THE RATE OF 9% A YEAR ON ANY AMOUNT THAT REMAINS UNPAID.
(II) INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE BEGINNING ON THE 60TH DAY
AFTER THE CONTRACTOR RECEIVES THE INVOICE.
(6) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY TO
OR PROHIBIT THE INCLUSION OF ANY RETAINAGE PROVISIONS IN A
SUBCONTRACTOR CONTRACT.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–228.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT” MEANS A CONTRACT TO DO
CONSTRUCTION BUSINESS.
(3) “CONTRACTOR” MEANS THE HOLDER OF A CONSTRUCTION
LICENSE WHO IS PARTY TO A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT.

HOUSE BILL 451
(4) “DO CONSTRUCTION BUSINESS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
17–601 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(5) “SUBCONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON OTHER THAN A LABORER
OR SUPPLIER OF MATERIALS WHO MAKES AN ORAL OR WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH:
(I) A CONTRACTOR TO PERFORM ALL OR PART OF A
CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT; OR
(II) ANOTHER SUBCONTRACTOR TO PERFORM ALL OR PART OF
A SUBCONTRACT TO A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT.
(B) (1) A CONTRACT BETWEEN A CONTRACTOR AND A SUBCONTRACTOR
TO PERFORM A PORTION OF A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE A
PROVISION THAT REQUIRES THE CONTRACTOR TO PAY THE SUBCONTRACTOR
WITHIN:
(I) 60 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF AN INVOICE FOLLOWING
SATISFACTORY COMPLETION OF THE PORTION OF THE WORK FOR WHICH THE
SUBCONTRACTOR HAS INVOICED; OR
(II) 7 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF PAYMENT BY THE OWNER TO THE
CONTRACTOR FOR WORK PERFORMED BY THE SUBCONTRACTOR.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO REQUIRE A CONTRACTOR TO PAY AMOUNTS INVOICED THAT ARE SUBJECT TO
WITHHOLDING AS A RESULT OF THE SUBCONTRACTOR’S NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE
CONTRACT.
(3) IF A CONTRACTOR WITHHOLDS ALL OR PART OF AN AMOUNT
INVOICED BY A SUBCONTRACTOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
CONTRACTOR SHALL NOTIFY THE SUBCONTRACTOR IN WRITING AND WITH
REASONABLE SPECIFICITY WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE INVOICE
OF:
(I) THE CONTRACTOR’S INTENTION TO WITHHOLD ALL OR PART
OF THE PAYMENT; AND
(II) THE REASON FOR THE WITHHOLDING.
(4) PAYMENT OF A CONTRACTOR BY A UNIT MAY NOT BE A REQUIRED
CONDITION FOR PAYMENT OF A SUBCONTRACTOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS

HOUSE BILL 451 7
SUBSECTION.
(5) (I) IF A CONTRACTOR DOES NOT PAY A SUBCONTRACTOR AS
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE
AT THE RATE OF 9% A YEAR ON ANY AMOUNT THAT REMAINS UNPAID.
(II) INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE BEGINNING ON THE 60TH DAY
AFTER THE CONTRACTOR RECEIVES THE INVOICE.
(6) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY TO
OR PROHIBIT THE INCLUSION OF ANY RETAINAGE PROVISIONS IN A
SUBCONTRACTOR CONTRACT.
15–103.
It is the policy of the State to make a payment under a procurement contract within
30 days:
(1) after the day on which the payment becomes due under the
procurement contract; or
(2) if later, after the day on which the unit receives an invoice.
15–104.
(a) Except as provided in § 15–105 of this subtitle, interest shall accrue at the
rate of 9% per annum on any amount that:
(1) is due and payable by law and under the written procurement contract;
and
(2) remains unpaid more than 45 days after a unit receives an invoice.
(b) Interest shall accrue beginning on the 31st day after:
(1) the day on which payment becomes due under a procurement contract;
or
(2) if later, the day on which the unit receives an invoice.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.